Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 7
OFFENSES - CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

1-13-701. Interference with election official - intimidation or retaliation against election official.

At any election provided by law, it is unlawful for any person to interfere in any manner with any election official in the discharge of the election official's duty or to induce any election official to violate or refuse to comply with the election official's duty or any law regulating the same.

It is unlawful for any person, whether verbally, in writing, or in person, to threaten, coerce, or intimidate an election official with the intent to:

Impede or interfere with the official while the official is engaged in the performance of the official's duties; or

Retaliate against the official on account of the official's performance of the official's duties.

This section does not apply to an enforcement action taken pursuant to section 1-1-107 or 1-1.5-104 or to an enforcement action taken by a designated election official against an election judge for a violation of a statute, a rule promulgated by the secretary of state, or the election judge's oath.

Upon conviction, a person who violates this section shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3127, § 23, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1273), ch. 324, p. 2291, § 1, effective June 2.

1-13-702. Interfering with watcher.

Any person who intentionally interferes with any watcher while the watcher is discharging the watcher's duties set forth in section 1-7-108 (3) upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1981, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3127, § 24, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-110 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-703. Tampering with statewide voter registration system, registration list, or pollbook.

Any person who mutilates or erases any name, figure, or word in any registration list or pollbook; or who removes a registration list or pollbook or any part thereof from the place where it has been deposited with an intention to destroy the same, or to procure or prevent the election of any person, or to prevent any voter from voting; or who destroys any registration list or pollbook or part thereof commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly accesses without authorization the statewide voter registration system commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 588, § 70, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3127, § 25, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-131 and 1-30-129 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-704. Unlawfully permitting to vote.

If at any election provided by law any judge of election knowingly and willfully permits any person to vote who is not entitled to vote at such election, such judge commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3128, § 26, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2964, § 6, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-13-704.5. Voting by persons not entitled to vote - penalty.

Any person voting in any election provided by law knowing that he or she is not entitled to vote in such election commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.

Source:

L. 2006, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 19, § 1, effective July 31.

1-13-705. Personating elector.

Any person who falsely personates any elector and votes at any election provided by law under the name of such elector commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 853, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3128, § 27, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-136 and 1-30-122 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-706. Delivering and receiving ballots at polls.

No voter shall receive an official ballot from any person except one of the judges of election having charge of the ballots, nor shall any person other than such judge deliver an official ballot to such voter.

No person except a judge of election shall receive from any voter a ballot prepared for voting.

Any voter who does not vote the ballot received by him or her shall return his or her ballot to the judge from whom he or she received the same before leaving the polling location; except that nothing in this section prohibits an elector from obtaining an original or replacement ballot pursuant to section 1-5-102.9 (3)(j).

Each violation of the provisions of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 433, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 747, § 118, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3128, § 28, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-139 and 1-30-114 (2) as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (3) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-707. Inducing defective ballot.

Any person who causes any deceit to be practiced with intent to fraudulently induce a voter to deposit a defective ballot so as to have the ballot thrown out and not counted upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 434, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3128, § 29, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-133 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-707.5. Tampering with ballot box.

Any person who wilfully tampers with or who, except as provided by law, wilfully breaks open any ballot box, including a drop-off location receptacle, is guilty of a class 5 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 566, § 26, effective May 9.

1-13-708. Tampering with voting equipment - definition.

Any person who, as determined by rules promulgated by the secretary of state in accordance with article 4 of title 24, accesses without authorization, tampers with, or facilitates the unauthorized access to or tampering with any electronic or electromechanical voting equipment or an election-night reporting system before, during, or after any election provided by law is guilty of a class 5 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Any person who knowingly publishes or causes to be published passwords or other confidential information relating to a voting system shall immediately have their authorized access revoked and is guilty of a class 5 felony.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 434, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 28, 108, effective May 28.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1982, § 33, effective August 3.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2283, § 16, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-132 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-13-708.5. Elected officials not to handle electronic or electromechanical voting equipment or devices.

Any person who violates any provision of section 1-5-607 commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added with relocations, p. 1764, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3128, § 30, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as 1-5-607 (4).

1-13-709. Voting in wrong polling location.

Any person who, at any election provided by law, knowingly votes or offers to vote in any polling location in which he or she is not qualified to vote upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 434, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 853, § 86, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 748, § 119, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3128, § 31, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-135 and 1-30-128 as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-709.5. Residence - false information - penalty.

Any person who votes by knowingly giving false information regarding the elector's place of present residence commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1764, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1464, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 566, § 27, effective May 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

1-13-709.6. Residence - conspiring to give false information - penalty.

Any person who knowingly aids or abets an elector in planning or committing the offense of knowingly giving false information regarding the elector's place of present residence described in section 1-13-709.5 commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 567, § 28, effective May 9.

1-13-710. Voting twice - penalty.

No voter shall, with the intent of voting more than once in an election:

Cast more than one ballot;

Offer to cast a ballot knowing that a ballot the voter previously returned was received; or

During a federal election, vote in this state and another state.

A voter who violates this subsection (1) upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Nothing in this section prohibits a voter from voting in a special district election as a property owner in accordance with article 13.5 of this title or part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 434, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 853, § 87, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 748, § 120, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 589, § 71, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1667, § 68, effective June 21; (1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3129, § 32, effective March 1, 2022.

1-13-711. Interference with voter while voting.

Any person who interferes with any voter who is inside the immediate voting area or is marking a ballot or operating a voting device or electronic voting device at any election provided by law upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 434, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1361, § 29, effective May 28.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3129, § 33, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-138 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-13-712. Disclosing or identifying vote.

No voter shall place any mark upon his or her ballot by means of which it can be identified as the one voted by him or her, and no other mark shall be placed on the ballot by any person to identify it after it has been prepared for voting.

Any voter may show his or her voted ballot to any other person as long as the disclosure is not undertaken in furtherance of any election violation proscribed in this article 13.

Any voter who makes available an image of the voter's own ballot through electronic means after it is prepared for voting is deemed to have consented to the transmittal of that image.

The ability of a voter to disclose his or her voted ballot as described in this subsection (1) at a voter service and polling center or at any other location at which votes are being tabulated is subject to the power of a county clerk and recorder to monitor activity at such voter service and polling center or other location, including placing reasonable restrictions on the use of photography in such settings or imposing other restrictions on activity in such settings as the county clerk and recorder finds necessary, to ensure the fair and efficient conduct of elections.

No person shall endeavor to induce any voter to show how he marked his ballot.

No election official, watcher, or person shall reveal to any other person the name of any candidate for whom a voter has voted or communicate to another his opinion, belief, or impression as to how or for whom a voter has voted.

Any person who violates any provision of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 434, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1014), ch. 42, p. 123, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3129, § 34, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-13-713. Intimidation.

It is unlawful for any person directly or indirectly, by himself or herself or by any other person in his or her behalf, to impede, prevent, or otherwise interfere with the free exercise of the elective franchise of any elector or to compel, induce, or prevail upon any elector either to give or refrain from giving the elector's vote at any election provided by law or to give or refrain from giving the elector's vote for any particular person or measure at any such election. Each such offense is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 435, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3129, § 35, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For criminal extortion (formerly criminal intimidation), see § 18-3-207.

1-13-714. Electioneering - removing and return of ballot - definition.

No person shall do any electioneering on the day of any election, or during the time when voting is permitted for any election, within any polling location or in any public street or room or in any public manner within one hundred feet of any building in which a polling location is located, as publicly posted by the designated election official.

As used in this section, the term "electioneering" includes:

Campaigning for or against any candidate who is on the ballot or any ballot issue or ballot question that is on the ballot.

The distribution or display of campaign posters, signs, or other campaign materials or apparel, including materials or apparel promoting or opposing a candidate or displaying a candidate's name, likeness, or campaign slogan.

Soliciting signatures for a candidate petition, a recall petition, or a petition to place a ballot issue or ballot question on a subsequent ballot.

"Electioneering" does not include a respectful display of the American flag.

Nothing in this section limits or prohibits the incidental display of buttons, shirts, hats, or other apparel that support various causes or political issues by individuals who are traveling through corridors subject to the one-hundred-foot electioneering restriction specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section seeking access to areas other than polling locations on campuses of state institutions of higher education.

Except as necessary for ballot counting, no person may remove any official ballot from the polling location before the closing of the polls.

Any person who violates any provision of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 435, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1179, § 72, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 853, § 88, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 2035, § 23, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 748, § 121, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 589, § 72, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1667, § 69, effective June 21; (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3129, § 36, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-127 and 1-30-114 (1) as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-715. Liquor in or near voter service and polling center.

It is unlawful for any election official or other person to introduce into any polling location, or to use therein, or to offer to another for use therein, at any time while any election is in progress or the result thereof is being ascertained by the counting of the ballots, any intoxicating malt, spirituous, or vinous liquors.

It is unlawful for any officer or board of officers of any county or any municipality, whether incorporated under general law or by special charter, who may at any time be by law charged with the duty of designating polling locations for the holding of any general or congressional election therein, to select therefor a room wherein any intoxicating malt, spirituous, or vinous liquors are usually sold for consumption on the premises.

Any person who violates any provision of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 435, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 358, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1765, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 748, § 122, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3129, § 37, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-128 and 1-30-115 as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1) and (2) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-716. Destroying, removing, or delaying delivery of election records.

No person shall willfully destroy, deface, or alter any ballot or any election records or willfully delay the delivery of any such ballots or election records, or take, carry away, conceal, or remove any ballot, ballot box, or election records from the polling location or drop-off location or from the possession of a person authorized by law to have the custody thereof, or aid, counsel, procure, advise, or assist any person to do any of the aforesaid acts.

No election official who has undertaken to deliver the official ballots and election records to the county clerk and recorder shall neglect or refuse to do so within the time prescribed by law or shall fail to account fully for all official ballots and other records in his charge. Informality in the delivery of the ballots and election records shall not invalidate the vote of any precinct if such records are delivered prior to the canvassing of the votes by the county board of canvassers.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 435, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 749, § 123, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3130, § 38, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (1) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-717. Penalty for destruction of supplies.

Any person who, during an election, willfully defaces, tears down, removes, or destroys any card of instruction or sample ballot printed or posted for the instruction of voters or who, during an election, willfully removes or destroys any of the supplies or conveniences furnished to enable a voter to prepare the voter's ballot or willfully hinders the voting of others upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 436, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3130, § 39, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-30-112 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-718. Release of information concerning count.

Any election official, watcher, or other person who releases information concerning the count of ballots cast at polling locations or of mail-in or mail voters' ballots prior to 7 p.m. on the day of the election upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 436, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1436, § 122, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1797, § 66, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 749, § 124, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3130, § 40, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-144 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-719. Employer's unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any employer, whether corporation, association, company, firm, or person, or any officer or agent of such employer:

In any manner to control the action of his employees in casting their votes for or against any person or measure at any precinct caucus, assembly, or convention; or

To refuse to an employee the privilege of taking time off to vote as provided by section 1-7-102, or to subject an employee to a penalty or reduction of wages because of the exercise of such privilege, or to violate any of the provisions of section 1-7-102 in any other way; or

In paying his employees the salary or wages due them, to enclose their pay in pay envelopes upon which there is written or printed any political mottoes, devices, or arguments containing threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions, views, or actions of such employees; or

Within ninety days of any election provided by law, to put up or otherwise exhibit in his factory, workshop, mine, mill, boardinghouse, office, or other establishment or place where his employees may be working or be present in the course of such employment any handbill, notice, or placard containing any threat, notice, or information that, if any particular ticket or candidate is elected, work in his place or establishment will cease in whole or in part, or his establishment will be closed, or the wages of his workmen will be reduced or containing other threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions or actions of his employees.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111. In addition, any corporation violating this section shall forfeit its charter and right to do business in this state.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 436, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3130, § 41, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-13-720. Unlawfully giving or promising money or employment or facilitating the trading of votes.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, individually or through any other person:

To pay, loan, or contribute, or offer or promise to pay, loan, or contribute, any money or other valuable consideration to or for any elector, or to or for any other person, to induce such elector to vote or refrain from voting at any election provided by law or to induce any elector to vote or refrain from voting at such election for any particular person or to induce such elector to go to the polls or remain away from the polls at such election or on account of such elector having voted or refrained from voting for any particular person or issue or having gone to the polls or remained away from the polls at such election;

To advance or pay, or cause to be paid, any money or other valuable thing to or for the use of any other person with the intent that the same, or any part thereof, shall be used in bribery at any election provided by law or to knowingly pay, or cause to be paid, any money or other valuable thing to any person in discharge or repayment of any money wholly or partially expended in bribery at any such election;

To give, offer, or promise any office, place, or employment or to promise, procure, or endeavor to procure any office, place, or employment to or for any elector, or to or for any other person, in order to induce such elector to vote or refrain from voting at any election provided by law or to induce any elector to vote or refrain from voting at such election for any particular person or issue; or

To facilitate the trading of votes between an elector in the state or a person in another state in exchange for the other person's vote for or against a particular candidate, ballot issue, or ballot question. A violation of this subsection (1)(d) is a petty offense.

Except for the offense set forth in subsection (1)(d) of this section, each offense set forth in subsection (1) of this section is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 436, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (2) amended and (1)(d) added, (SB 18-076), ch. 202, p. 1315, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) and (2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3130, § 42, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-122 and 1-30-102 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-721. Receipt of money or jobs.

A person who directly or indirectly, by himself or herself or through any other person shall not:

Before or during an election provided by law, to receive, agree to accept, or contract for any money, gift, loan, or other valuable consideration, office, place, or employment, for himself or any other person, for voting or agreeing to vote, or for going or agreeing to go to the polls, or for remaining away or agreeing to remain away from the polls, or for refraining or agreeing to refrain from voting, or for voting or agreeing to vote or refraining or agreeing to refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any election provided by law;

During or after an election provided by law, to receive any money or other valuable thing on account of himself or any other person for voting or refraining from voting at such election, or on account of himself or any other person for voting or refraining from voting for any particular person at such election, or on account of himself or any other person for going to the polls or remaining away from the polls at such election, or on account of having induced any person to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at such election.

A person who violates subsection (1) of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 437, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 82:

IP(1) amended, p. 220, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended and (2) added, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3131, § 43, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-123 and 1-30-103 as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For the penalty for offenses denominated by this code as misdemeanors, see § 1-13-111.

1-13-722. Defacing or removing abstract of votes. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 437, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 492, § 23, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 616, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 1-13-149 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-723. Penalty for neglect of duty - destruction of ballots - breaking seal.

Every officer upon whom any duty is imposed by any election law who violates the officer's duty or who neglects or omits to perform the same upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Any official or person, except one authorized by law, who breaks or loosens a seal on a ballot or a ballot box with the intent to disclose or learn the number of such ballot or ballot box upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 438, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3131, § 44, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-13-724. Unlawfully carrying a firearm at a polling location or drop box - exception - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The Colorado constitution guarantees free and open elections;

All Coloradans should be able to exercise their fundamental right to vote freely and safely;

Openly carried firearms in or near a polling location or drop box may intimidate, threaten, or coerce voters, affecting Coloradans' exercise of their voting rights; and

Due in part to such concerns, states have regulated firearms at polling locations since the nineteenth century.

The general assembly further declares that:

Regulating openly carried firearms at polling locations and drop boxes is substantially related to the general assembly's interest in ensuring all Colorado voters have the right to vote in an environment that is safe and free from intimidation;

Nothing in this "Vote Without Fear Act" is intended to shield a person from prosecution for a violation of section 1-13-713; and

The general assembly further finds that security personnel contracted for the protection of any location in Colorado that includes a polling location or drop box shall take the utmost care to provide a safe voting environment, while still ensuring that their presence and behavior does not have an intimidating, threatening, or coercive effect on a voter who is exercising the voter's right to vote.

The short title of this section is the "Vote Without Fear Act".

It is unlawful for any person to openly carry a firearm, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(h), within any polling location, or within one hundred feet of a drop box or any building in which a polling location is located, as publicly posted by the designated election official, on the day of any election or during the time when voting is permitted for any election. The designated election official responsible for any central count facility, polling location, or drop box involved in that election cycle shall visibly place a sign notifying persons of the one-hundred-foot no open carry zone for firearms required pursuant to this section.

It is unlawful for any person to openly carry a firearm, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(h), within a central count facility, or within one hundred feet of any building in which a central count facility is located, during any ongoing election administration activity related to an active election conducted by the designated election official, as publicly posted by the designated election official.

This subsection (1) does not apply to:

A person who openly carries a firearm that the person owns on the person's private property that is within the one-hundred-foot buffer zone or while traveling directly between the person's private property and a place outside the one-hundred-foot buffer zone; or

A uniformed security guard employed by a contract security agency, as defined in section 24-33.5-415.4, acting within the scope of the authority granted by and in the performance of a contractual agreement for the provision of security services with a person or entity that owns or controls the facility, building, or location subject to this section.

This section does not apply to a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, acting within the scope of the peace officer's authority and in the performance of the peace officer's duties.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three hundred sixty-four days, or by both fine and imprisonment; except that, for a first offense, the fine shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars and the sentence of imprisonment shall not exceed one hundred twenty days.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1086), ch. 50, p. 237, § 1, effective March 30.